Mississippi, session 2026, HB1671.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 43-21-111, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 43-21-111.  (1)  In any county not having a county court or family court the judge may appoint as provided in Section 43-21-123 regular or special referees who shall be attorneys at law and members of the bar in good standing to act in cases concerning children within the jurisdiction of the youth court, and a regular referee shall hold office until removed by the judge.  The requirement that regular or special referees appointed pursuant to this subsection be attorneys shall apply only to regular or special referees who were not first appointed regular or special referees prior to July 1, 1991. (2)  Any referee appointed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall be required to receive judicial training approved by the Mississippi Judicial College and shall be required to receive regular annual continuing education in the field of juvenile justice. The amount of judicial training and annual continuing education which shall be satisfactory to fulfill the requirements of this section shall conform with the amount prescribed by the Rules and Regulations for Mandatory Continuing Judicial Education promulgated by the Supreme Court.  The Administrative Office of Courts shall maintain a roll of referees appointed under this section, shall enforce the provisions of this subsection and shall maintain records on all such referees regarding such training.  Should a referee miss two (2) consecutive training sessions sponsored or approved by the Mississippi Judicial College as required by this subsection or fail to attend one (1) such training session within six (6) months of their initial appointment as a referee, the referee shall be disqualified to serve and be immediately removed as a referee and another member of the bar shall be appointed as provided in this section. (3)  The judge may direct that hearings in any case or class of cases be conducted in the first instance by the referee.  The judge may also delegate his own administrative responsibilities to the referee. (4)  All hearings authorized to be heard by a referee shall proceed in the same manner as hearings before the youth court judge.  A referee shall possess all powers and perform all the duties of the youth court judge in the hearings authorized to be heard by the referee. (5)  An order entered by the referee shall be mailed immediately to all parties and their counsel.  A rehearing by the judge shall be allowed if any party files a written motion for a rehearing or on the court's own motion within three (3) days after notice of referee's order.  The youth court may enlarge the time for filing a motion for a rehearing for good cause shown.  Any rehearing shall be upon the record of the hearing before the referee, but additional evidence may be admitted in the discretion of the judge.  A motion for a rehearing shall not act as a supersedeas of the referee's order, unless the judge shall so order. (6)  The salary for the referee shall be fixed on order of the judge as provided in Section 43-21-123 and shall be paid by the county out of any available funds budgeted for the youth court by the board of supervisors. (7)  Upon request of the boards of supervisors of two (2) or more counties, the judge of the chancery court may appoint a suitable person as referee to two (2) or more counties within his district, and the payment of salary may be divided in such ratio as may be agreed upon by the boards of supervisors. SECTION 2.  Section 43-21-125, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 43-21-125.  (1)  There shall be a Mississippi Council of Youth Court Judges which shall be the official organization of the judges having youth court jurisdiction in this state. The membership of the council shall consist of all the judges and referees of youth courts in the State of Mississippi. (2)  The Mississippi Council of Youth Court Judges is authorized to adopt and, from time to time, amend such rules, regulations or bylaws as it considers necessary to the conduct of its affairs. (3)  The council may elect officers and provide for such meetings of the council as it deems necessary. The council shall meet at least annually for the consideration of: (a)  Any and all matters pertaining to the discharge of the official duties and obligations of its members; and (b)  Problems that have arisen in connection with the operation of the youth courts in any county or in all counties in order to improve the administration of juvenile justice in the state. (4)  The council shall publish and submit to the Governor, the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court, and the Mississippi Judicial Council an annual report of the operations which shall include financial and statistical data and may include suggestions and recommendations for legislation. (5)  The council is authorized to receive and expend any funds which may become available from the federal government to carry out any of the purposes of this chapter, and to this end the council may meet any federal requirements not contrary to state law which may be conditions precedent to receiving such federal funds. (6)  The council may cooperate with the federal government in a program for training personnel employed or preparing for employment by the youth court and may receive and expend funds from federal or state sources or from private donations for such purposes. The council may contract with public or nonprofit institutions of higher learning for the training of such personnel, may conduct short-term training courses of its own, may hire experts on a temporary basis for such purpose and may cooperate with the Department of Youth Services or other state departments or agencies in personnel training programs. SECTION 3.  Section 43-21-305, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 43-21-305.  A law enforcement officer may stop any child abroad in a public place whom the officer has probable cause to believe is within the jurisdiction of the youth court and may question the child as to his name, address and explanation of his actions. SECTION 4.  Section 43-21-703, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 43-21-703.  (1)  The commission shall study the youth court system in Mississippi, and prepare a report including any proposed changes in the youth court system and/or its procedures. It shall submit the report to the Legislature, on or before October 1, 2024, along with a report detailing any legislation which may be needed to implement the plan.  In preparing the report, the commission shall evaluate the existing juvenile services in the state and may recommend changes in the organizational concepts, institutions, laws and resources. (2)  In formulating its report, the commission shall take into consideration the following: (a)  Whether a uniform statewide youth court system would be desirable; (b)  How best the service needs of the state could be met in relation to the taxing and resource capacity of various multi-county districts now existing or proposed; (c)  Whether counties in a given service area or district may develop district shelters, detention centers and diagnostic centers to serve a multi-county area; and (d)  What proposals or alternatives would update or modernize the system to provide staffing for all counties and citizens. (3)  The commission, in addition to recommending the plan described in this section, shall serve as a clearinghouse and information center for the collection, preparation, analysis and dissemination of information on the youth court system in Mississippi and shall conduct ongoing research relating to the improvement of the youth court system.  Pursuant to its duties under this subsection, the commission may request the regular submission to it of such reports, information and statistics by the courts, judges, prosecuting attorneys and agencies of this state which the commission deems necessary for the development of its reports. SECTION 5.  Section 43-21-751, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 43-21-751.  This act shall be known as the "Teen Court Pilot Program Act." SECTION 6.  Section 43-21-753, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 43-21-753.  The youth court of any county in the state may establish a teen court program for the diversion of certain offenders who have waived all right of confidentiality and privilege against self-incrimination.  The youth court of Rankin County may extend its teen court program within the city limits of Pearl.  The offenders eligible to participate shall be those offenders who in the discretion of the youth court are suitable and compulsory-school-age children who have come into the jurisdiction of the youth court as a result of not attending school.  The teen court shall be a preventive program for juveniles comprised of youth who are not less than thirteen (13) nor more than seventeen (17) years of age, which students shall serve as prosecutor, defense counsel, bailiff, court clerk and jurors.  The program is to administer the "sentencing" or disposition phase of the proceedings against offenders who elect to participate, shall be under the guidance of the local youth court, and shall be approved by the local youth court.  The youth court judge, or his designee who is a licensed attorney, shall preside.  The teen court is authorized to require eligible offenders who choose to go to teen court in lieu of youth court to perform up to one hundred twelve (112) hours of community service, require offenders to make a personal apology to a victim, require offenders to submit a research paper on any relevant subject, attend counseling and make restitution or any other disposition authorized by the youth court.  The youth court shall establish rules and regulations, including sentencing guidelines, for the operation of a teen court.  The teen court is authorized to accept monies from any available public or private source, including public or private donations, grants, gifts and appropriated funds for funding expenses of operating the court. Teen court may be held at whatever location the youth court selects at whatever time or times.  Eligible offenders shall be only those children who agree to participate in the teen court and to abide by the teen court's rulings, whose parents or legal guardian shall also so agree, and who are otherwise qualified to participate. The youth court judge may require an offender who elects to participate in the teen court to pay a fee not to exceed Five Dollars ($5.00); any such fees shall be used in administering this article, and the fee shall not be refunded, regardless of whether the child successfully completes the teen court program. SECTION 7.  Section 43-21-755, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 43-21-755.  Any school participating in the Teen Court Program established by this article shall be allowed to credit the time of teachers and students spent in participating in teen court as instructional time. SECTION 8.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.